Washington statutes.
RCW 19.335.030

Advertising or promotion disclosures.

(1) It is unlawful for any person to advertise or promote any event, presentation, seminar, workshop, or other public gathering regarding veterans' benefits or entitlements that does not include the following disclosure: "This event is not sponsored by, or affiliated with, the United States Department of Veterans Affairs, the Washington State Department of Veterans Affairs, or any other congressionally chartered or recognized organization of honorably discharged members of the Armed Forces of the United States or any of their auxiliaries. Products or services that may be discussed at this event are not necessarily endorsed by those organizations. You may qualify for benefits other than or in addition to the benefits discussed at this event."

(2) The disclosure required by subsection (1) of this section must be in the same type size and font as the term "veteran" or any variation of that term as used in the event advertisement or promotional materials.

(3) The disclosure required by subsection (1) of this section must be disseminated, both orally and in writing, at the beginning of any event, presentation, seminar, workshop, or other public gathering regarding veterans' benefits or entitlements.

(4) The disclosure required by subsection (1) of this section does not apply where the United States department of veterans affairs, the Washington state department of veterans affairs, or any other congressionally chartered or recognized organization of honorably discharged members of the armed forces of the United States or any of their auxiliaries have granted written permission to the advertiser or promoter for the use of its name, symbol, or insignia to advertise or promote such events, presentations, seminars, workshops, or other public gatherings. The disclosure required by subsection (1) of this section also does not apply where the event, presentation, seminar, workshop, or gathering is part of an accredited continuing legal education course.

[ 2014 c 67 s 4.]